Maryland, session 2025, SB0791.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–1002.
(b) (1) There is a career ladder for educators in the State.
(f) The levels of the career ladder are as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0791*

SENATE BILL 791
(1) Level one is a State certified teacher;
(2) Level two is a teacher pursuing:
(i) A master’s degree;
(ii) 30 credits of a program of study approved by the State Board, in
consultation with the Professional Standards and Teacher Education Board; or
(iii) NBC;
(3) Level three is:
(i) An NBC teacher;
(ii) If there is no assessment comparable to NBC for the teacher’s
subject area, a teacher with a master’s degree in the teacher’s subject area; or
(iii) An assistant principal; and
(4) Level four is:
(i) A teacher on the teacher leadership track, in the following tiers:
1. Lead Teacher;
2. Distinguished Teacher; or
3. Professor Distinguished Teacher; or
(ii) A teacher on the administrator track, in the following tiers:
1. Licensed Principal; or
2. Distinguished Principal.
6–1003.
(a) Beginning with teachers listed under § 6–1002(h)(3) of this subtitle, as
specified by the State Board, a teacher on level one, two, or three of the career ladder shall:
(1) Teach in the classroom on average [60%] 80% of the teacher’s working
time; and
(2) Spend the remaining time on other teacher activities, including:
(i) Improving instruction;

SENATE BILL 791 3
(ii) Identifying, working with, and tutoring students who need
additional help;
(iii) Working with the most challenging students;
(iv) Working with students living in concentrated poverty; and
(v) Leading or participating in professional learning.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.